Washington statutes.
RCW 18.79.010

Purpose.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

It is the purpose of the *nursing care quality assurance commission to regulate the competency and quality of professional health care providers under its jurisdiction by establishing, monitoring, and enforcing qualifications for licensing, consistent standards of practice, continuing competency mechanisms, and discipline. Rules, policies, and procedures developed by the *commission must promote the delivery of quality health care to the residents of the state of Washington.

[1994 sp.s. c 9 s 401.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The reference to "nursing care quality assurance commission" was changed to "board of nursing" by 2023 c 123.